Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 151 Geology and Water Resources

151.010.
Establishment and personnel of survey.

There is hereby established and shall be maintained within the University of Kentucky a bureau of geological research and information to be known and designated as the Kentucky Geological Survey. The survey shall be under the direction of a person who shall be designated director of the survey and who shall be appointed in the same manner as other staff members of the university. The survey shall have a nonteaching staff to be appointed in the same manner as other staff members of the university. The director or a member of the nonteaching staff shall be designated state geologist and all members of the survey shall be employees of the University of Kentucky within the provisions of KRS 164.220 to 164.230, inclusive.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 224, § 2; 1958, ch. 122, § 1.

151.020.
Other departments of university to cooperate.

The other departments of the University of Kentucky, and the teaching staff of the department of geology, shall furnish cooperative services in carrying out the functions of the Kentucky Geological Survey.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 224, § 2.

151.030.
Duties and functions of survey.

The Kentucky Geological Survey shall make a continuing geological study of the state and perform such other functions as are directed toward the development of the mineral resources of the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 224, § 3.

151.035.
Official repository for groundwater information.

The Kentucky Geological Survey shall be designated as the Commonwealth’s official repository for all information relating to the occurrence and quality of groundwater as defined in KRS 151.100.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and any other cabinet, department, commission, board, or governmental agency, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, that, by statute, administrative regulation, or as part of its routine activities, collects or generates information about groundwater, shall transmit or cause to be transmitted that information to the Kentucky Geological Survey within ninety (90) days of receipt or generation, or a time determined between the Geological Survey and the other party.

The information to be transmitted may include:

Drillers logs and completion reports of wells drilled or dug for the purpose of producing, testing, or monitoring groundwater;

Geophysical logs of water wells;

Water quality analyses of both organic and inorganic constituents;

Results of all pump, extraction, and injection tests;

Flow determinations of surface discharges of groundwater; and

Any additional data as the Kentucky Geological Survey shall require.

All institutions of higher learning shall be encouraged, but not required, to submit to the Kentucky Geological Survey copies of all research data, including theses and dissertations relating to the occurrence or quality of groundwater.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 416, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 105, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 121, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 176, effective July 15, 2010.

151.040.
Reports and publications.

The Kentucky Geological Survey shall report periodically on its findings to the Governor and General Assembly and such reports shall be available to the public. It shall at all times furnish cooperative services to the Cabinet for Economic Development and such other state agencies as may request its services, and make available to those agencies such information and data as are at the disposal of the survey. The survey may issue reports, maps, and other publications for sale at a price prescribed by the governing authorities of the University of Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 224, § 4; 1958, ch. 122, § 2; 1982, ch. 396, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 105, § 66, effective July 14, 1992.

151.050.
Transfer of facilities of former Division of Geology. [Repealed.]

151.100.
Definitions for KRS 151.110 to 151.460 and 151.990.

As used in KRS 151.110 to 151.460 and 151.990, the words listed herein shall have the following respective meanings, unless another or different meaning or intent shall be clearly indicated by the context:

The word “authority” shall mean the Water Resources Authority of Kentucky;

The word “cabinet” shall mean the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

The word “stream” or “watercourse” shall mean any river, creek or channel, having well defined banks, in which water flows for substantial periods of the year to drain a given area, or any lake or other body of water in the Commonwealth;

The word “diffused surface water” shall mean that water which comes from falling rain or melting snow or ice, and which is diffused over the surface of the ground, or which temporarily flows vagrantly upon or over the surface of the ground as the natural elevations and depressions of the surface of the earth may guide it, until such water reaches a stream or watercourse;

The word “ground water” or “subterranean water” shall mean all water which fills the natural openings under the earth’s surface including all underground watercourses, artesian basins, reservoirs, lakes, and other bodies of water below the earth’s surface;

The word “floodway” shall mean that area of a stream or watercourse necessary to carry off flood water as determined by the secretary;

The word “floodplain” shall mean the area in a watershed that is subject to inundation;

The word “watershed” shall mean all the area from which all drainage passes a given point downstream;

The word “domestic use” shall mean the use of water for ordinary household purposes, and drinking water for poultry, livestock, and domestic animals;

The word “water resources project” or “project” shall mean any structural or nonstructural study, plan, design, construction, development, improvement or any other activity including programs for management, intended to conserve and develop the water resources of the Commonwealth and shall include all aspects of water supply, flood damage abatement, navigation, water-related recreation, and land conservation facilities and measures;

The word “withdraw” or “withdrawal of water” shall mean the actual removal or taking of water from any stream, watercourse or other body of public water;

The word “dam” shall mean any artificial barrier, including appurtenant works, which does or can impound or divert water, and which either:

Is or will be twenty-five (25) feet or more in height from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse at the downstream toe of the barrier, as determined by the cabinet; or

Has or will have an impounding capacity at maximum water storage elevation of fifty (50) acre-feet or more;

“Embankment dam” shall mean any dam constructed of excavated natural materials or of industrial waste materials;

“Gravity dam” shall mean a dam constructed of concrete or masonry that relies on its weight for stability;

The word “person” shall mean any individual, public or private corporation, political subdivision, government agency, municipality, copartnership, association, firm, trust, estate, or other entity whatsoever;

“Secretary” shall mean the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Authorized representative” shall mean an individual specifically authorized by the secretary to act in his behalf;

The word “reservoir” shall mean any basin which contains or will contain the water impounded by a dam;

“Owner” shall mean any person who owns an interest in, controls, or operates a dam; and

“Livestock” shall mean cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1974, ch. 285, § 1; 1982, ch. 214, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 84, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 405, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2010, ch. 24, § 177, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 129, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

151.110.
Water resources policy — Duties of cabinet.

The conservation, development, and proper use of the water resources of the Commonwealth of Kentucky have become of vital importance as a result of population expansion and concentration, industrial growth, technological advances, and an ever increasing demand for water for varied domestic, agricultural, industrial, municipal, and recreational uses. It is recognized by the General Assembly that excessive rainfall during certain seasons of the year causes damage from overflowing streams. However, prolonged droughts at other seasons curtail industrial, municipal, agricultural, and recreational uses of water and seriously threaten the continued growth and economic well-being of the Commonwealth. The advancement of the safety, happiness, and welfare of the people and the protection of property require that the power inherent in the people be utilized to promote and to regulate the conservation, development, and most beneficial use of the water resources. It is hereby declared that the general welfare requires that the water resources of the Commonwealth be put to the beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable, that the waste or nonbeneficial use of water be prevented, and that the conservation and beneficial use of water be exercised in the interest of the people. Therefore, it is declared the policy of the Commonwealth to actively encourage and to provide financial, technical, or other support for projects that will control and store our water resources in order that the continued growth and development of the Commonwealth might be assured. To that end, it is declared to be the purpose of KRS Chapters 146, 149, 151, 224, 262, and KRS 350.029 and 433.750 to 433.757 for the Commonwealth to permit, regulate, and participate in the construction or financing of facilities to store surplus surface water for future use; to conserve and develop the ground water resources of the Commonwealth; to require local communities to develop long range water supply plans; to protect the rights of all persons equitably and reasonably interested in the use and availability of water; to prohibit the pollution of water resources and to maintain the normal flow of all streams so that the proper quantity and quality of water will be available at all times to the people of the Commonwealth; to provide for the adequate disposition of water among the people of the Commonwealth entitled to its use during severe droughts or times of emergency; to prevent harmful overflows and flooding; to regulate the construction, maintenance, and operation of all dams and other barriers of streams; to prevent the obstruction of streams and floodways by the dumping of substances therein; to keep accurate records on the amount of water withdrawal from streams and watercourses and reasonably regulate the amount of withdrawal of public water; and to engage in other activities as may be necessary to conserve and develop the water resources of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and to ensure adequate supply of water for domestic, agricultural, recreational, and economic development uses.
(1) (a)

The conservation, development, and proper use of the water resources of the Commonwealth of Kentucky have become of vital importance as a result of population expansion and concentration, industrial growth, technological advances, and an ever increasing demand for water for varied domestic, agricultural, industrial, municipal, and recreational uses. It is recognized by the General Assembly that excessive rainfall during certain seasons of the year causes damage from overflowing streams. However, prolonged droughts at other seasons curtail industrial, municipal, agricultural, and recreational uses of water and seriously threaten the continued growth and economic well-being of the Commonwealth. The advancement of the safety, happiness, and welfare of the people and the protection of property require that the power inherent in the people be utilized to promote and to regulate the conservation, development, and most beneficial use of the water resources. It is hereby declared that the general welfare requires that the water resources of the Commonwealth be put to the beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable, that the waste or nonbeneficial use of water be prevented, and that the conservation and beneficial use of water be exercised in the interest of the people. Therefore, it is declared the policy of the Commonwealth to actively encourage and to provide financial, technical, or other support for projects that will control and store our water resources in order that the continued growth and development of the Commonwealth might be assured. To that end, it is declared to be the purpose of KRS Chapters 146, 149, 151, 224, 262, and KRS 350.029 and 433.750 to 433.757 for the Commonwealth to permit, regulate, and participate in the construction or financing of facilities to store surplus surface water for future use; to conserve and develop the ground water resources of the Commonwealth; to require local communities to develop long range water supply plans; to protect the rights of all persons equitably and reasonably interested in the use and availability of water; to prohibit the pollution of water resources and to maintain the normal flow of all streams so that the proper quantity and quality of water will be available at all times to the people of the Commonwealth; to provide for the adequate disposition of water among the people of the Commonwealth entitled to its use during severe droughts or times of emergency; to prevent harmful overflows and flooding; to regulate the construction, maintenance, and operation of all dams and other barriers of streams; to prevent the obstruction of streams and floodways by the dumping of substances therein; to keep accurate records on the amount of water withdrawal from streams and watercourses and reasonably regulate the amount of withdrawal of public water; and to engage in other activities as may be necessary to conserve and develop the water resources of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and to ensure adequate supply of water for domestic, agricultural, recreational, and economic development uses.

The cabinet shall:

Provide leadership in water use efficiency for all water uses;

Promote conservation;

Offer technical assistance and conduct research;

Be the lead agency with other state and local agencies to incorporate conservation measures and incentives into their programs;

Sponsor “technology transfer sessions” on water conservation to commercial and industrial operations;

Provide leadership to communities looking for information and methods for coping with the issues of growth and water supply;

Provide leadership for on-farm and rural community drought and water assessment, monitoring, and improvement for agricultural purposes; and

Have the authority to receive and disperse federal, state, and other funds for the purpose of on-farm and community drought and water assessment, monitoring, and improvements.

Subsection (1)(b) shall not be construed as changing the relationship between the cabinet and the Kentucky River Authority and their respective responsibilities for oversight of the Kentucky River as set out in KRS 151.700 and 151.720.

It is a finding of the General Assembly that groundwater is an important but vulnerable natural resource of this state, that the majority of rural Kentuckians rely exclusively on groundwater for drinking, and that groundwater is inextricably linked to surface waters which may also serve as a drinking water resource. It is also a finding that groundwater is a resource equally vital for agricultural, commercial, and industrial purposes and that useable groundwater is critical to the future development of these industries. Therefore, it shall be the policy of this state to manage groundwater for the health, welfare, and economic prosperity of all citizens.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 39, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 367, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2016 ch. 39, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

151.112.
Planning process for management and development of water resources.

The cabinet shall develop a comprehensive and systematic planning process for the long-range management and orderly development of the Commonwealth’s water resources. The planning process shall generate over each biennium a plan for the implementation of specific goals and management objectives for the cabinet to achieve in meeting the Commonwealth’s water needs. The biennial plan shall serve as the basis for the cabinet’s budgeting process in allocating resources to the state’s water resource programs. The planning process shall be developed to:

Protect, conserve, develop, and utilize the water resource in a manner consistent with the Commonwealth’s duties for management of natural resources, the public’s right to clean water, and the preservation of the natural, scenic, cultural, historic, and aesthetic values of the environment;

Provide a coordinated framework for cooperation among federal, interstate, state, and local government agencies in the planning and management of water resources, in a manner consistent with KRS Chapter 147 and KRS 224.10-100(13);

Be both anticipatory of future needs and reactive to problems;

Provide for public involvement in the establishment of the comprehensive and systematic planning process, in plan development and implementation, and the allocation and prioritizing of resources for water resource management and development; and

Establish a process for the collection and coordination of data regarding surface and ground water availability and quality, including the presence of point and nonpoint sources of pollution, instream flow information, withdrawal and use information, an assessment of flood damage and storm water management problems, and an identification and assessment of future data needs.

The continuous planning process shall include goals and objectives for ground and surface water quantity and quality management in order to assess the effectiveness of current programs in addressing the comprehensive water needs of the Commonwealth and to gauge the need for new or different programs to recommend to the General Assembly for legislation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 367, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

151.113.
Kentucky Water Resources Board.

The Kentucky Water Resources Board is hereby created for the purposes of assisting the cabinet in the implementation of KRS 151.110 and 151.112. The board shall be attached to the cabinet for administrative purposes.

The Kentucky Water Resources Board shall:

Assist the cabinet in conducting research and developing recommendations to enhance the quality of water resources accessible for agricultural production in the state;

Research emerging water resources issues, including the adequacy of water supplies available for agricultural production and in rural Kentucky;

Examine potential actions to address deficiencies in water supplies identified by the board;

Make recommendations for developing new and reliable water sources for key areas of farm production in Kentucky;

Develop and provide the cabinet with recommendations regarding water use efficiency for all agricultural water uses;

Develop recommendations for a strategy to promote water conservation in agricultural uses;

Develop and provide recommendations to the cabinet, the Department of Agriculture, and the Soil and Water Conservation Commission regarding on-farm and rural community drought and water assessment, monitoring, and improvements for agricultural purposes; and

Request technical assistance from the following groups in order to establish a process for the collection and coordination of data on surface and ground water availability, water quality, the presence of point and nonpoint sources of pollution, instream flow, water withdrawal and use, flood damage and storm water management, and the identification and assessment of future data needs:

Kentucky Geological Survey;

United States Geological Survey;

Kentucky Water Resources Institute;

Interagency Technical Advisory Committee on Groundwater;

Soil and Water Conservation Commission; and

Any other water group the board deems necessary.

The Kentucky Water Resources Board shall consist of eleven (11) members as follows:

The secretary of the cabinet or the secretary’s designee, who shall serve as chair;

The Commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s designee, who shall serve as vice chair;

The dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture, Food, and Environment or the dean’s designee;

Six (6) members appointed by the Governor as follows:

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Association of Conservation Districts, who shall serve an initial term of four (4) years;

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce, who shall serve an initial term of four (4) years;

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky County Judge/Executive Association, who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Farm Bureau, who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and

One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Rural Water Association, who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and

The board shall have two (2) nonvoting liaisons who are members of the General Assembly, one (1) of whom shall be a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one (1) of whom shall be a member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate.

Members appointed under subsection (3)(d) of this section shall serve a term of four (4) years and may be reappointed. A person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of that term.

The Kentucky Water Resources Board shall meet at the call of the chair, and members shall not receive compensation for serving on the board.
(5) (a)

The Kentucky Water Resources Board shall meet at the call of the chair, and members shall not receive compensation for serving on the board.

Six (6) members shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

151.114.
Long range water supply plans.

The cabinet shall administer a program for the purpose of developing long range water supply plans for each county and its municipalities and public water systems or for a region composed of more than one (1) county. The plans to be developed shall include an assessment of the existing public and private water resources, both surface and groundwater, of the study area, an examination of present water use in the area, projections of future water requirements, and a determination of possible alternative approaches that can be taken in order to meet future water supply needs.

The plans may be developed by area development districts in conjunction with the counties and its municipalities and public water systems within each district. A county and its municipalities and public water systems may require that the plan be developed for its jurisdictional area only or, if there is agreement between two (2) or more counties, that the plan be developed jointly with other counties.

The plans shall be subject to approval by the cabinet. The cabinet is authorized to approve any water supply plan developed outside of this program which meets the guidelines set out in KRS 151.110 and 151.114 to 151.118 and the criteria established by cabinet regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 410, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

151.116.
Regulations.

The cabinet shall promulgate regulations to carry out the program and shall consult with the Cabinet for Economic Development in developing those regulations. The regulations shall set out the details which are to be included in the water supply plans, the procedure for counties and their municipalities and public water systems to apply for financial assistance to pay for the plans, and the criteria and process by which the cabinet will approve plans. The cabinet shall assemble all information in a uniform database available to all agencies and concerned entities.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 410, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

151.118.
Financing development of water supply plans.

The cabinet, in conjunction with a county and its municipalities and public water systems, shall finance the development of the water supply plans and encourage multicounty cooperation. The county and its municipalities and public water systems shall pay up to twenty percent (20%) of the total cost of plan development. A county and its municipalities and public water systems shall be given credit toward its share of the plan’s cost for in-kind services performed.

The financial assistance of the cabinet shall be available until July 15, 1999.

After July 15, 1999, the full cost of water supply plan development will be the responsibility of any county and its municipalities and public water systems which has not had a plan approved by the cabinet.

After July 15, 1999, the cabinet shall not endorse projects that impact water under the Kentucky intergovernmental review process for any county and its municipalities and public water systems which does not have an approved water supply plan.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 410, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

151.120.
Public water of Commonwealth, what constitutes.

Water occurring in any stream, lake, ground water, subterranean water or other body of water in the Commonwealth which may be applied to any useful and beneficial purpose is hereby declared to be a natural resource and public water of the Commonwealth and subject to control or regulation for the public welfare as provided in KRS Chapters 146, 149, 151, 262 and 350.029 and 433.750 to 433.757.

Diffused surface water which flows vagrantly over the surface of the ground shall not be regarded as public water, and the owner of land on which such water falls or flows shall have the right to its use. Water left standing in natural pools in a natural stream when the natural flow of the stream has ceased, shall not be regarded as public water and the owners of land contiguous to that water shall have the rights to its use.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 16.

151.125.
Authority and powers of secretary.

The secretary shall exercise the following authority and powers:

To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated thereunder;

To conduct or obtain investigations, research, experiments, training programs and demonstrations, and to collect and disseminate information relating to the safe construction, operation, or maintenance of dams and reservoirs;

To adopt, after giving public notice and affording an opportunity to all interested persons to appear and offer evidence at a public hearing in connection therewith, general rules and regulations for flood control and water resources which he deems necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. Such rules and regulations, which shall have the force and effect of law, shall be of uniform application as far as practicable, but they may take proper account of differences in topography, geology, soil conditions, climate, hydrology, and use of the reservoir and the lands lying in the floodplain downstream from the dam;

To adopt, without notice or hearing, rules and regulations with respect to procedural aspects of hearings, the filing of reports and orders, the issuance of certificates of inspection, construction permits, water withdrawal permits, and other procedural matters;

To issue orders requiring the adoption by an owner of remedial measures necessary for the safety of life, or public or private property, or for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, or rules and regulations issued thereunder;

To examine and approve or disapprove applications for construction permits for the construction, enlargement, repair, or alteration of a dam;

To establish standards for the safe construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, maintenance, or operation of a dam or reservoir. Such standards shall be issued in the form of regulations as described in subsection (3) of this section;

To make such investigations or inspections as necessary to determine the condition of a dam to insure compliance with any provisions of this chapter, including the right to enter at any time upon an area affected for such purposes and the right of ingress and egress across intervening properties;

To order the suspension or revocation, after warning, of any certificate of inspection, construction permit, or water withdrawal permit for failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or with any rules, regulations or orders adopted pursuant thereto, or with any of the conditions contained in or attached to the certificate of inspection, construction permits, or water withdrawal permits;

To order the immediate cessation of any act that is started or continued without a construction permit or water withdrawal permit as required by the provisions of this chapter;

To institute and prosecute all such court actions as may be necessary to obtain the enforcement of any order issued by the cabinet in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 285, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9).

151.130.
Division of water of department of natural resources created — Director, appointment — Personnel. [Repealed.]

151.140.
Withdrawal of water from public waters, permit required — Exceptions.

No person, business, industry, city, county, water district, or other political subdivision shall have the right to withdraw, divert, or transfer public water from a stream, lake, ground water source or other body of water, unless such person, business, industry, city, county, water district or other political subdivision has been granted a permit by the cabinet for such withdrawal, diversion, or transfer of water. Provided, however, no permit shall be required for and nothing herein shall interfere with the use of water for agricultural and domestic purposes including irrigation; and no permit shall be required if the amount of water withdrawn, diverted or transferred is less than the amount established by regulation and no permit shall be required for water used in the production of steam generating plants of companies whose retail rates are regulated by the Kentucky Public Service Commission or for which plants a certificate of environmental compatibility from such commission is required by law, or water injected underground in conjunction with operations for the production of oil or gas.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 18; 1972, ch. 213, § 1; 1974, ch. 285, § 3; 1978, ch. 266, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

151.150.
Application for permit — Withdrawal of water from public waters.

Any person, business, industry, city, county, water district or other political subdivision desiring to withdraw, divert, or transfer public water must register with the cabinet and submit an application for a permit on a form to be supplied by the cabinet.

Any person, business, industry, city, county, water district or other political subdivision withdrawing, transferring or diverting public water from a stream, lake, ground water source, or other body of public water within or along the borders of the Commonwealth without a permit as required in KRS 151.140 shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS 151.990.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 19.

151.160.
Record and report of water withdrawn under permit — Effect of noncompliance.

All public water withdrawn, diverted or transferred pursuant to a permit under KRS 151.140 must be recorded and a report thereof submitted to the cabinet in a manner prescribed by the cabinet.

The willful failure to keep accurate records of the withdrawal, diversion or transfer of public water or the failure to submit reports as prescribed by the cabinet shall subject the permit holder to the provisions of KRS 151.990 and possible revocation of the permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 20; 1974, ch. 285, § 4.

151.170.
Permits to be specific — Issuance — Amendment.

All permits issued under KRS 151.140 shall be specific in terms of quantity, time, place and rate of diversion, transfer or withdrawal of public water. Such permits represent a limited right of use and do not vest ownership nor an absolute right to withdraw or use the water.

The cabinet shall issue a permit to the applicant if an investigation by the cabinet reveals that the quantity, time, place or rate of withdrawal of public water will not be detrimental to the public interests or rights of other public water users. No permit shall be denied to a responsible applicant who has established an amount of water for which he has a need for a useful purpose, provided the requested amount of water is available.

A permit may be issued for an amount of water withdrawal less than that applied for, if found by the cabinet to be in the best interests of the public or other water users.

Permits for the withdrawal, transfer, or diversion of public water may be amended at any time upon application to the cabinet by the withdrawer, or by the cabinet when the reports indicate that the withdrawer is using a substantially different amount than permitted.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 21; 1974, ch. 285, § 5; 1984, ch. 111, § 85, effective July 13, 1984.

151.180.
Petition for hearing — Notice — Conduct of hearing — Findings — Appeal. [Repealed.]

151.182.
Notice of violation and hearing thereon — Demand for hearing on denial, modification or revocation of permit.

Whenever the cabinet has reason to believe that a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation promulgated pursuant thereto has occurred, it may issue and serve upon the person complained against a written notice of the provision of this chapter or the regulation alleged to have been violated and the facts alleged to constitute the violation thereof. Further, this notice shall require the person so complained against to answer the charges set out in the notice at a hearing before the cabinet at a time not less than thirty (30) days after the date of notice unless the person complained against waives in writing the thirty (30) day period.

Except as provided in KRS 151.297 regarding emergency situations, any person not previously heard in connection with the issuance of any order or the making of any final determination by which he considers himself aggrieved may file with the cabinet a petition alleging that the order or final determination is contrary to law or fact and is injurious to him, alleging the grounds and reasons therefor, and demand a hearing. An order or final determination includes, but is not limited to, the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of a permit, but does not include the issuance of a notice of violation, the issuance of a letter identifying deficiencies in an application for a permit, a registration or a certification, or other nonfinal determinations. Unless the cabinet considers that the petition is frivolous, it shall serve written notice of the petition on each person named therein and shall schedule a hearing before the cabinet not less than thirty (30) days after the date of such notice, or unless the person complained against waives in writing the thirty (30) day period. The right to demand a hearing pursuant to this section shall be limited to a period of thirty (30) days after the petitioner has had actual notice of the order or final determination complained of, or could reasonably have had such notice.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 253, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 215, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

151.184.
Hearing conducted by hearing officer — Final determination by secretary — Use of counsel — Subpoena power — Hearings to be public.

All hearings under this chapter shall be held before a qualified hearing officer, who may be a full-time employee of the cabinet, serve by contract, or be paid on a per diem basis at the discretion of the cabinet. After the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall within thirty (30) days make a report to the secretary and a recommended order which shall contain a finding of fact and a conclusion of law. If the secretary finds upon written request of the hearing officer that additional time is needed, then the secretary may grant an extension. The hearing officer shall serve a copy of his report and recommended order upon all parties of record to the proceeding and they shall be granted the right to file within fourteen (14) days of receipt exceptions thereto. The secretary shall consider the report, exceptions, and recommended order and decide the case. The decision shall be served by mail upon all parties and shall be a final order of the cabinet.

Any party to a hearing conducted pursuant to this chapter may be represented by counsel, make oral or written argument, offer testimony, cross-examine witnesses, or take any combination of such actions. The record of the hearing shall be open to public inspection, and copies thereof shall be made available to any person upon payment of the actual cost of reproducing the original.

In connection with a hearing the cabinet shall issue subpoenas in response to any reasonable request by any party to the hearing requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence relevant to any matter involved in the hearing. In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, the Franklin Circuit Court, upon application by the cabinet, may issue to that person an order requiring him to appear before the cabinet, there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question; and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be open to the public.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 253, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 215, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.